Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6023HV (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2535 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 708.7A Written or electronic 1 threats to kill, cause bodily injury, or conduct a mass shooting 2 or an act of terrorism ââ punishment ââ exemption from liability. 3 1. As used in this section, âelectronic recordâ means any 4 record created, modified, archived, received, or distributed 5 electronically that contains any combination of text, graphics, 6 video, audio, or pictorial representation in digital form, but 7 does not include a telephone call. 8 2. A person shall not send, post, or transmit, or procure 9 the sending, posting, or transmission of, a writing or other 10 record, including an electronic record, in any manner in which 11 it may be viewed by another person, when in such writing or 12 record the person makes a threat to do any of the following: 13 a. Kill or cause bodily harm to another person. 14 b. Conduct a mass shooting or an act of terrorism. 15 3. A person who commits a violation of this section commits 16 a class âCâ felony. 17 4. The transmission, storage, or caching of electronic 18 communications or messages or use of related telecommunications 19 service, commercial mobile radio service, or information 20 service by a person who violates this section does not impose 21 liability on the provider of an interactive computer service, 22 a communications service, a commercial mobile service, or an 23 information service, including but not limited to an internet 24 service provider or a hosting service provider, that was used 25 by the person. 26